cs: Orientace obtisku: Obojí (dvojí účel); Aplikace zevnitř skla (zrcadlový tisk); Aplikace zvenku; Jiné
pt-BR: Orientação do decalque: Qualquer (dupla finalidade); Aplicação interna no vidro (impressão reversa); Aplicação externa; Outra
el: Προσανατολισμός αυτοκόλλητων: Οποιοδήποτε (διπλής χρήσης); Εφαρμογή σε τζάμι εσωτερικά (αντίστροφη εκτύπωση); Εξωτερική εφαρμογή; Άλλο
de: Ausrichtung des Aufklebers: Beides (Dual-Use); Innenverklebung (Spiegeldruck); Außenverklebung; Sonstige
da: Klistermærkets retning: Begge (kombineret formål); Montering indvendigt på glas (omvendt tryk); Udvendig montering; Andet
pl: Orientacja naklejki: Dowolna (podwójnego przeznaczenia); Aplikacja po wewnętrznej stronie szyby (druk lustrzany); Aplikacja na zewnątrz; Inne
vi: Hướng dán decal: Cả hai (mục đích kép); Dán mặt trong kính (in ngược); Dán mặt ngoài; Khác
pt-PT: Orientação do decalque: Qualquer uma (dupla finalidade); Aplicação no interior do vidro (impressão invertida); Aplicação no exterior; Outro
sv: Dekalorientering: Båda (kombinerad); Applicering på insidan av glas (spegelvänd utskrift); Applicering på utsidan; Övrigt
fr: Orientation de l’autocollant: L'un ou l'autre (double usage); Application sur la face intérieure de la vitre (impression inversée); Application extérieure; Autre
en: Decal orientation: Either (dual-purpose); Inside-glass application (reverse print); Outside application; Other
ko: 데칼 방향: 양면(겸용); 유리 내부 부착(역인쇄); 외부 부착; 기타
sl-SI: Položaj nalepke: Oboje (dvojni namen); Namestitev na notranjo stran stekla (obratni tisk); Namestitev na zunanjo stran; Drugo
nl: Decal oriëntatie: Beide (twee doeleinden); Aanbrengen binnenzijde glas (gespiegelde bedrukking); Aanbrengen buitenzijde; Overige
sk-SK: Orientácia nálepky: Oboje (na dvojaké použitie); Aplikácia na sklo zvnútra (obrátená potlač); Aplikácia zvonka; Iné
ro-RO: Orientarea autocolantului: Oricare (dublu scop); Aplicare pe interiorul sticlei (imprimare inversată); Aplicare la exterior; Altele
zh-CN: 贴花朝向: 均可（双重用途）; 玻璃内侧安装（反向印刷）; 外部安装; 其他
it: Orientamento adesivo: Entrambe (doppio scopo); Applicazione su vetro interno (stampa speculare); Applicazione esterna; Altra
lt-LT: Lipduko orientacija: Bet kuri (dvejopos paskirties); Klijavimas stiklo viduje (atvirkštinė spauda); Klijavimas iš išorės; Kita
ru: Ориентация декали: Любая (двустороннее назначение); Для нанесения на стекло изнутри (обратная печать); Наружное нанесение; Другое
ja: デカールの向き: 両用 (兼用); ガラス内側貼り (裏刷り); 外側貼り; その他
nb: Dekalretning: Begge (kombinert); Påføring på innsiden av glass (omvendt trykk); Påføring på utsiden; Annet
hr-HR: Orijentacija naljepnice: Bilo koje (dvostruka namjena); Nanošenje na unutarnju stranu stakla (obrnuti ispis); Vanjsko nanošenje; Ostalo
es: Orientación de la calcomanía: Ambos (doble propósito); Aplicación en el interior del vidrio (impresión invertida); Aplicación en el exterior; Otro
th: ทิศทางการจัดวางสติกเกอร์ดีคอล: แบบใดก็ได้ (ใช้งานได้สองแบบ); ติดด้านในกระจก (พิมพ์กลับด้าน); ติดด้านนอก; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 貼紙方向: 皆可 (雙向適用); 玻璃內側貼 (反向印刷); 外部貼; 其他
hu: Matrica tájolása: Bármelyik (kétfunkciós); Üvegen belüli felvitel (tükrözött nyomtatás); Külső felvitel; Egyéb
bg-BG: Ориентация на стикера: И двете (с двойно предназначение); За вътрешно поставяне на стъкло (огледален печат); За външно поставяне; Други
tr: Çıkartmanın yönü: Her ikisi (çift amaçlı); İç cam uygulaması (ters baskı); Dış uygulama; Diğer
fi: Teippauksen suunta: Jompikumpi (kaksikäyttöinen); Lasin sisäpuolelle kiinnitettävä (käänteinen painatus); Ulkopuolelle kiinnitettävä; Muu